Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-1705] Council powers. The
medical education council may:

(1) Conduct surveys, with the assistance of the
department of health and the department of commerce and consumer affairs, to
assess and meet changing market and education needs;

(2) Appoint advisory committees of broad
representation on interdisciplinary clinical education, workforce mix planning
and projections, funding mechanisms, and other topics as is necessary;

(3) Use federal moneys for necessary administrative
expenses to carry out its duties and powers as permitted by federal law;

(4) Distribute program moneys in accordance with this
subpart; provided that any expenditures authorized shall be for a public
purpose and shall not be subject to chapters 42F, 103, 103D, and 103F;

(5) Hire employees not subject to chapters 76 and 89
necessary to carry out its duties under this subpart; and

(6) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91,
necessary to carry out the purposes of this subpart. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next